Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 15. Uniform Interstate Compact on Juveniles.

Revisor’s notes. —

By letter of June 23, 2009, the commissioner of health and social services notified the revisor of statutes that at least 37 states have signed this compact.
Therefore, under §§ 14 and 15, ch. 37, SLA 2009, the 2009 amendments of this chapter took effect July 1, 2009.